District of Columbia statutes.
13-402

Uniformity of interpretation.

When the statutory language so permits, this chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to make it uniform with the laws of those jurisdictions which enact in comparable form the first two articles of the Uniform Interstate and International Procedure Act.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 548, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 132(a)
1981 Ed., § 13-402.
1973 Ed., § 13-402.